District of Columbia statutes.
2-1217.33l

Information reporting.

Within 3 days after the Mayor’s receipt of the transcript of proceedings relating to the issuance of the bonds, the Mayor shall transmit a copy of the transcript to the Secretary to the Council.

Nov. 25, 2008, D.C. Law 17-278, § 13, 55 DCR 11050